Maryland, session 2026, SB0414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1006.3.
(A) THERE IS A CONSUMPTION–ONLY NONPROFIT SWIM CLUB LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A NONPROFIT SWIM CLUB.
(C) (1) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO ALLOW
MEMBERS OF THE SWIM CLUB AND THEIR GUESTS TO BRING BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR ONTO THE LICENSED PREMISES FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
– 1 –

Ch. 829 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY ALLOW THE CONSUMPTION OF BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR:
(I) IN A DESIGNATED AREA OF THE SWIM CLUB;
(II) DURING A DESIGNATED EVENT; AND
(III) UP TO 5 DAYS PER YEAR, UNLESS ADDITIONAL DAYS ARE
AUTHORIZED BY THE BOARD.
(D) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE BOARD AT
LEAST 10 DAYS PRIOR TO A DESIGNATED EVENT WHERE ALCOHOL WILL BE
CONSUMED.
(E) DURING A DESIGNATED EVENT, THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY ALLOW THE
CONSUMPTION OF BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR IN THE DESIGNATED AREA FROM 2 P.M.
TO 10 P.M.
(F) (1) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $100.
(2) THE FEE FOR ADDITIONAL DAYS IS $50 PER DAY, UP TO A
MAXIMUM OF 3 ADDITIONAL DAYS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –